California statutes. Civil Code
(c) Without limiting any rights of the creditor or any guarantor or other surety to use any other language to express an intent to waive any or all of the rights and defenses described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), the following provisions in a contract shall effectively waive all rights and defenses described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a):The guarantor waives all rights and defenses that the guarantor may have because the debtor’s debt is secured by real property. This means, among other things:(1) The creditor may collect from the guarantor without first foreclosing on any real or
personal property collateral pledged by the debtor.(2) If the creditor forecloses on any real property collateral pledged by the debtor:(A) The amount of the debt may be reduced only by the price for which that collateral is sold at the foreclosure sale, even if the collateral is worth more than the sale price.(B) The creditor may collect from the guarantor even if the creditor, by foreclosing on the real property collateral, has destroyed any right the guarantor may have to collect from the debtor.This is an unconditional and irrevocable waiver of any rights and defenses the guarantor may have because the debtor’s debt is secured by real property. These rights and defenses include, but are not
limited to, any rights or defenses based upon Section 580a, 580b, 580d, or 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Without limiting any rights of the creditor or any guarantor or other surety to use any other language to express an intent to waive all rights and defenses of the surety by reason of any election of remedies by the creditor, the following provision shall be effective to waive all rights and defenses the guarantor or other surety may have in respect of his or her obligations as a surety by reason of an election of remedies by the creditor:The guarantor waives all rights and defenses arising out of an election of remedies by the creditor, even though that election of remedies, such as a nonjudicial
foreclosure with respect to security for a guaranteed obligation, has destroyed the guarantor’s rights of subrogation and reimbursement against the principal by the operation of Section 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure or otherwise.

(e) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) shall not apply to a guaranty or other type of suretyship obligation made in respect of a loan secured by a deed of trust or mortgage on a dwelling for not more than four families when the dwelling is occupied, entirely or in part, by the borrower and that loan was in fact used to pay all or part of the purchase price of that dwelling.

(f) The validity of a waiver executed before January 1, 1997, shall be determined by the application of the law that existed on the date that the waiver was executed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1013, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 13.5. OBLIGATION TO DEFEND ACTION [2860. - 2860.]

2860.

(a) If the provisions of a policy of insurance impose a duty to defend upon an insurer and a conflict of interest arises which creates a duty on the part of the insurer to provide independent counsel to the insured, the insurer shall provide independent counsel to represent the insured unless, at the time the insured is informed that a possible conflict may arise or does exist, the insured expressly waives, in writing, the right to independent counsel. An insurance contract may contain a provision which sets forth the method of selecting that counsel consistent with this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, a conflict of interest does not exist as to allegations or facts in the litigation for which the insurer denies coverage; however, when an insurer reserves its rights on a given issue and the outcome of that coverage issue can be controlled by counsel first retained by the insurer for the defense of the claim, a conflict of interest may exist. No conflict of interest shall be deemed to exist as to allegations of punitive damages or be deemed to exist solely because an insured is sued for an amount in excess of the insurance policy limits.

(c) When the insured has selected independent counsel to represent him or her, the insurer may exercise its right to require that the counsel selected by the insured possess certain minimum qualifications which may include that the selected counsel have (1) at least five years of civil litigation practice which includes substantial defense experience in the
 subject at issue in the litigation, and (2) errors and omissions coverage. The insurer’s obligation to pay fees to the independent counsel selected by the insured is limited to the rates which are actually paid by the insurer to attorneys retained by it in the ordinary course of business in the defense of similar actions in the community where the claim arose or is being defended. This subdivision does not invalidate other different or additional policy provisions pertaining to attorney’s fees or providing for methods of settlement of disputes concerning those fees. Any dispute concerning attorney’s fees not resolved by these methods shall be resolved by final and binding arbitration by a single neutral arbitrator selected by the parties to the dispute.

(d) When independent counsel has been selected by the insured, it shall be the duty of that counsel and the insured to disclose to the insurer all information concerning the action except
 privileged materials relevant to coverage disputes, and timely to inform and consult with the insurer on all matters relating to the action. Any claim of privilege asserted is subject to in camera review in the appropriate law and motion department of the superior court. Any information disclosed by the insured or by independent counsel is not a waiver of the privilege as to any other party.

(e) The insured may waive its right to select independent counsel by signing the following statement: 
“I have been advised and informed of my right to select independent counsel to represent me in this lawsuit. I have considered this matter fully and freely waive my right to select independent counsel at this time. I authorize my insurer to select a defense attorney to represent me in this lawsuit.”

(f) Where the insured selects independent counsel pursuant to the provisions of this
 section, both the counsel provided by the insurer and independent counsel selected by the insured shall be allowed to participate in all aspects of the litigation. Counsel shall cooperate fully in the exchange of information that is consistent with each counsel’s ethical and legal obligation to the insured. Nothing in this section shall relieve the insured of his or her duty to cooperate with the insurer under the terms of the insurance contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1114, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 14. LIEN [2872. - 3081.]



  CHAPTER 1. Liens in General [2872. - 2914.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition of Liens [2872. - 2877.]

2872.

A lien is a charge imposed in some mode other than by a transfer in trust upon specific property by which it is made security for the performance of an act.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1877-78, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

2873.

Liens are either general or special.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2874.

A general lien is one which the holder thereof is entitled to enforce as a security for the performance of all the obligations, or all of a particular class of obligations, which exist in his favor against the owner of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2875.

A special lien is one which the holder thereof can enforce only as security for the performance of a particular act or obligation, and of such obligations as may be incidental thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2876.

Where the holder of a special lien is compelled to satisfy a prior lien for his own protection, he may enforce payment of the amount so paid by him, as a part of the claim for which his own lien exists.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2877.

Contracts of mortgage, pledge, bottomry, or respondentia are subject to all of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 13.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Creation of Liens [2881. - 2885.]

2881.

A lien is created:

1. By contract of the parties; or,

2. By operation of law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2882.

No lien arises by mere operation of law until the time at which the act to be secured thereby ought to be performed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2883.

(a) An agreement may be made to create a lien upon property not yet acquired by the party agreeing to give the lien, or not yet in existence. In that case the lien agreed for attaches from the time when the party agreeing to give it acquires an interest in the thing, to the extent of such interest.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), an agreement by a beneficiary of an estate that is subject to administration, as provided in Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000) of
 the Probate Code, to create a lien upon real property in the estate that is undistributed at the time the agreement is entered into, shall create no lien upon the real property unless and until the real property is distributed to that beneficiary. Upon recordation of an order confirming the sale of the real property pursuant to Section 10313 of the Probate Code and the recording of a duly executed deed in accordance therewith, any expectancy of a lien in the real property under the agreement shall be extinguished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 527, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.

A lien may be created by contract, to take immediate effect, as security for the performance of obligations not then in existence.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2885.

Any state agency, upon recording a state tax lien against real property, shall mail written notice of the recordation to the tax debtor, unless previous correspondence mailed to the address of record was returned undelivered with no forwarding address. Failure to notify the tax debtor shall not affect the constructive notice otherwise imparted by recordation, nor shall it affect the force, effect, or priority otherwise accorded such tax lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 643, Sec. 1.   Effective September 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Effect of Liens [2888. - 2892.]

2888.

Notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, a lien, or a contract for a lien, transfers no title to the property subject to the lien.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.

All contracts for the forfeiture of property subject to a lien, in satisfaction of the obligation secured thereby, and all contracts in restraint of the right of redemption from a lien, are void.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2890.

The creation of a lien does not of itself imply that any person is bound to perform the act for which the lien is a security.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2891.

The existence of a lien upon property does not of itself entitle the person in whose favor it exists to a lien upon the same property for the performance of any other obligation than that which the lien originally secured.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.

One who holds property by virtue of a lien thereon, is not entitled to compensation from the owner thereof for any trouble or expense which he incurs respecting it, except to the same extent as a borrower, under Sections 1892 and 1893.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Priority of Liens [2897. - 2899.]

2897.

Other things being equal, different liens upon the same property have priority according to the time of their creation, except in cases of bottomry and respondentia.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2898.

(a) A mortgage or deed of trust given for the price of real property, at the time of its conveyance, has priority over all other liens created against the purchaser, subject to the operation of the recording laws.

(b) The priority of the lien of a mortgage or deed of trust on an estate for years in real property shall be determined in the same manner as for determining the priority of a lien of a mortgage or deed of trust on real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2899.

Where one has a lien upon several things, and other persons have subordinate liens upon, or interests in, some but not all of the same things, the person having the prior lien, if he can do so without risk of loss to himself, or of injustice to other persons, must resort to the property in the following order, on the demand of any party interested:

1. To the things upon which he has an exclusive lien;

2. To the things which are subject to the fewest subordinate liens;

3. In like manner inversely
 to the number of subordinate liens upon the same thing; and,

4. When several things are within one of the foregoing classes, and subject to the same number of liens, resort must be had—

(1.) To the things which have not been transferred since the prior lien was created;

(2.) To the things which have been so transferred without a valuable consideration; and,

(3.) To the things which have been so transferred for a valuable consideration in the inverse order of the transfer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redemption From Lien [2903. - 2906.]

2903.

Every person, having an interest in property subject to a lien, has a right to redeem it from the lien, at any time after the claim is due, and before his right of redemption is foreclosed, and, by such redemption, becomes subrogated to all the benefits of the lien, as against all owners of other interests in the property, except in so far as he was bound to make such redemption for their benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

2904.

One who has a lien inferior to another, upon the same property, has a right:

1. To redeem the property in the same manner as its owner might, from the superior lien; and,

2. To be subrogated to all the benefits of the superior lien, when necessary for the protection of his interests, upon satisfying the claim secured thereby.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

Redemption from a lien is made by performing, or offering to perform, the act for the performance of which it is a security, and paying, or offering to pay, the damages, if any, to which the holder of the lien is entitled for delay.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2906.

An option granted to a secured party by a debtor to acquire an interest in real property collateral takes priority as of its recording and is effective according to its terms if the right to exercise the option is not dependent upon the occurrence of a default with respect to the security agreement and, where the real property which is the subject of the option is other than residential real property containing four or fewer units, shall not be deemed invalid or ineffective on the basis that the secured party has impaired the debtor’s equity of redemption in violation of common law or Section 2889. This section shall not be construed to make valid or
 effective an otherwise unlawful option nor shall any inference be drawn from this section as to the validity or application of common law with respect to residential real property containing four or fewer units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Extinction of Liens [2909. - 2914.]

2909.

A lien is to be deemed accessory to the act for the performance of which it is a security, whether any person is bound for such performance or not, and is extinguishable in like manner with any other accessory obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.

The sale of any property on which there is a lien, in satisfaction of the claim secured thereby, or in case of personal property, its wrongful conversion by the person holding the lien, extinguishes the lien thereon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2911.

A lien is extinguished by the lapse of time within which, under the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure, either:

1. An action can be brought upon the principal obligation, or

2. A treasurer, street superintendent or other public official may sell any real property to satisfy a public improvement assessment or any bond issued to represent such assessment and which assessment is secured by a lien upon said real property; whichever is later.

Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, any lien
 heretofore existing or which may hereafter exist upon real property to secure the payment of a public improvement assessment shall be presumed to have been extinguished at the expiration of four years after the due date of such assessment or the last installment thereof, or four years after the date the lien attaches, or on January 1, 1947, whichever is later, or in the event bonds were or shall be issued to represent such assessment, the lien shall then be presumed to have been extinguished at the expiration of four years after the due date of said bonds or of the last installment thereof or of the last principal coupon attached thereto, or on January 1, 1947, whichever is later. The presumptions mentioned in this paragraph shall be conclusive in favor of a bona fide purchaser for value of said property after such dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

2912.

The partial performance of an act secured by a lien does not extinguish the lien upon any part of the property subject thereto, even if it is divisible.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2913.

The voluntary restoration of property to its owner by the holder of a lien thereon dependent upon possession extinguishes the lien as to such property, unless otherwise agreed by the parties, and extinguishes it, notwithstanding any such agreement, as to creditors of the owner and persons, subsequently acquiring a title to the property, or a lien thereon, in good faith, and for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

2914.

None of the provisions of this chapter apply to any transaction or security interest governed by the Uniform Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Mortgage [2920. - 2968.]



  ARTICLE 1. Mortgages in General [2920. - 2944.10.]

2920.

(a) A mortgage is a contract by which specific property, including an estate for years in real property, is hypothecated for the performance of an act, without the necessity of a change of possession.

(b) For purposes of Sections 2924 to 2924h, inclusive, “mortgage” also means any security device or instrument, other than a deed of trust, that confers a power of sale affecting real property or an estate for years therein, to be exercised after breach of the obligation so secured, including a real property sales contract, as defined in Section 2985, which contains
 such a provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2920.5.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Mortgage servicer” means a person or entity who directly services a loan, or who is responsible for interacting with the borrower, managing the loan account on a daily basis including collecting and crediting periodic loan payments, managing any escrow account, or enforcing the note and
 security instrument, either as the current owner of the promissory note or as the current owner’s authorized agent. “Mortgage servicer” also means a subservicing agent to a master servicer by contract. “Mortgage servicer” shall not include a trustee, or a trustee’s authorized agent, acting under a power of sale pursuant to a deed of trust.

(b) “Foreclosure prevention alternative” means a first lien loan modification or another available loss mitigation option.

(c) (1) Unless otherwise provided and for purposes of Sections 2923.4, 2923.5, 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, 2924.18, and 2924.19, “borrower” means any natural person who is a mortgagor or trustor and who is potentially eligible for any federal, state, or proprietary foreclosure prevention alternative program offered by, or through, his or her mortgage servicer.

(2) For purposes of the sections listed in paragraph (1), “borrower” shall not include any of the following:

(A) An individual who has surrendered the secured property as evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the property to the mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent.

(B) An individual who has contracted with an organization, person, or entity whose primary business is advising people who have decided to leave their homes on how to extend the foreclosure process and avoid their contractual obligations to mortgagees or beneficiaries.

(C) An individual who has filed a case under Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13 of Title 11 of the United States Code and the bankruptcy court has not entered an order closing or
 dismissing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from a stay of foreclosure.

(d) “First lien” means the most senior mortgage or deed of trust on the property that is the subject of the notice of default or notice of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 87, Sec. 2.   (SB 900)   Effective January 1, 2013.   See identical section added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

2921.

A mortgage may be created upon property held adversely to the mortgagor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2922.

A mortgage can be created, renewed, or extended, only by writing, executed with the formalities required in the case of a grant of real property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.

The lien of a mortgage is special, unless otherwise expressly agreed, and is independent of possession.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.1.

(a) A mortgage broker providing mortgage brokerage services to a borrower is the fiduciary of the borrower, and any violation of the broker’s fiduciary duties shall be a violation of the mortgage broker’s license law. This fiduciary duty includes a requirement that the mortgage broker place the economic interest of the borrower ahead of his or her own economic interest. A mortgage broker who provides mortgage brokerage services to the borrower owes this fiduciary duty to the
 borrower regardless of whether the mortgage broker is acting as an agent for any other party in connection with the residential mortgage loan transaction.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Licensed person” means a real estate broker licensed under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code), a finance lender or broker licensed under the California Finance Lenders Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code), a residential mortgage lender licensed under the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code), a commercial or industrial bank organized under the Banking Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code), a savings association organized under the Savings Association Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Financial Code), and
 a credit union organized under the California Credit Union Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of the Financial Code).

(2) “Mortgage broker” means a licensed person who provides mortgage brokerage services. For purposes of this section, a licensed person who makes a residential mortgage loan is a “mortgage broker,” and subject to the requirements of this section applicable to mortgage brokers, only with respect to transactions in which the licensed person provides mortgage brokerage services.

(3) “Mortgage brokerage services” means arranging or attempting to arrange, as exclusive agent for the borrower or as dual agent for the borrower and lender, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, paid directly or indirectly, a residential mortgage loan made by an unaffiliated third party.

(4) “Residential mortgage loan” means a consumer credit transaction that is secured by residential real property that is
 improved by four or fewer residential units.

(c) The duties set forth in this section shall not be construed to limit or narrow any other fiduciary duty of a mortgage broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 2.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.3.

(a) With respect to residential real property containing no more than four dwelling units, a mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall provide to the mortgagor or trustor a copy of the recorded notice of default with an attached separate summary document of the notice of default in English and the languages described in Section 1632, as set forth in subdivision (c), and a copy of the recorded notice of sale with an attached separate summary document of the information required to be contained in the notice of sale in English and the languages described in Section 1632, as set forth in subdivision (d). These summaries are not required to be recorded or published. This subdivision shall become operative on April 1, 2013, or 90 days following the issuance of the translations by the Department of Financial
 Protection and Innovation pursuant to subdivision (b), whichever is later.

(b) (1) The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall provide a standard translation of the statement in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and of the summary of the notice of default, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) in the languages described in Section 1632.

(2) The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall provide a standard translation of the statement in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and of the summary of the notice of sale, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall make the translations described in paragraphs (1) and (2) available without charge on its internet website. Any mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent who
 provides the department’s translations in the manner prescribed by this section shall be in compliance with this section.

(c) (1) The following statement shall appear in the languages described in Section 1632 at the beginning of the notice of default:
NOTE: THERE IS A SUMMARY OF THE INFORMATION IN THIS DOCUMENT ATTACHED.
(2) The following summary of key information shall be attached to the copy of the notice of default provided to the mortgagor or trustor:
SUMMARY OF KEY INFORMATION

The attached notice of default was sent to [name of the trustor], in relation to [description of the property
 that secures the mortgage or deed of trust in default]. This property may be sold to satisfy your obligation and any other obligation secured by the deed of trust or mortgage that is in default. [Trustor] has, as described in the notice of default, breached the mortgage or deed of trust on the property described above.

IMPORTANT NOTICE: IF YOUR PROPERTY IS IN FORECLOSURE BECAUSE YOU ARE BEHIND IN YOUR PAYMENTS, IT MAY BE SOLD WITHOUT ANY COURT ACTION, and you may have the legal right to bring your account in good standing by paying all of your past due payments plus permitted costs and expenses within the time permitted by law for reinstatement of your account, which is normally five business days prior to the date set for the sale of your property. No sale date may be set until approximately 90 days from the date the attached notice of default may be recorded (which date of recordation appears on the notice).

This amount
 is ____________ as of ___(date)____________and will increase until your account becomes current.

While your property is in foreclosure, you still must pay other obligations (such as insurance and taxes) required by your note and deed of trust or mortgage. If you fail to make future payments on the loan, pay taxes on the property, provide insurance on the property, or pay other obligations as required in the note and deed of trust or mortgage, the beneficiary or mortgagee may insist that you do so in order to reinstate your account in good standing. In addition, the beneficiary or mortgagee may require as a condition to reinstatement that you provide reliable written evidence that you paid all senior liens, property taxes, and hazard insurance premiums.

Upon your written request, the beneficiary or mortgagee will give you a written itemization of the entire amount you must pay. You may not have to pay the entire unpaid
 portion of your account, even though full payment was demanded, but you must pay all amounts in default at the time payment is made. However, you and your beneficiary or mortgagee may mutually agree in writing prior to the time the notice of sale is posted (which may not be earlier than three months after this notice of default is recorded) to, among other things, (1) provide additional time in which to cure the default by transfer of the property or otherwise; or (2) establish a schedule of payments in order to cure your default; or both (1) and (2).

Following the expiration of the time period referred to in the first paragraph of this notice, unless the obligation being foreclosed upon or a separate written agreement between you and your creditor permits a longer period, you have only the legal right to stop the sale of your property by paying the entire amount demanded by your creditor.

To find out the amount you must
 pay, or to arrange for payment to stop the foreclosure, or if your property is in foreclosure for any other reason, contact:

____________________________________

(Name of beneficiary or mortgagee)

____________________________________

(Mailing address)

____________________________________

(Telephone)

If you have any questions, you should contact a lawyer or the governmental agency which may have insured your loan.

Notwithstanding the fact that your property is in foreclosure, you may offer your property for sale, provided the sale is concluded prior to the conclusion of the foreclosure.

Remember, YOU MAY LOSE LEGAL RIGHTS IF YOU
 DO NOT TAKE PROMPT ACTION.

If you would like additional copies of this summary, you may obtain them by calling [insert telephone number].

(d) (1) The following statement shall appear in the languages described in Section 1632 at the beginning of the notice of sale:
NOTE: THERE IS A SUMMARY OF THE INFORMATION IN THIS DOCUMENT ATTACHED.
(2) The following summary of key information shall be attached to the copy of the notice of sale provided to the mortgagor or trustor:
SUMMARY OF KEY INFORMATION

The attached notice of sale was sent to [trustor], in
 relation to [description of the property that secures the mortgage or deed of trust in default].

YOU ARE IN DEFAULT UNDER A (Deed of trust or mortgage) DATED ____. UNLESS YOU TAKE ACTION TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY, IT MAY BE SOLD AT A PUBLIC SALE.

IF YOU NEED AN EXPLANATION OF THE NATURE OF THE PROCEEDING AGAINST YOU, YOU SHOULD CONTACT A LAWYER.

The total amount due in the notice of sale is ____.

Your property is scheduled to be sold on [insert date and time of sale] at [insert location of sale].

However, the sale date shown on the attached notice of sale may be postponed one or more times by the mortgagee, beneficiary, trustee, or a court, pursuant to Section 2924g of the California Civil Code. The law requires that information about trustee sale postponements be made available to you and to the
 public, as a courtesy to those not present at the sale. If you wish to learn whether your sale date has been postponed, and, if applicable, the rescheduled time and date for the sale of this property, you may call [telephone number for information regarding the trustee’s sale] or visit this internet website [internet website address for information regarding the sale of this property], using the file number assigned to this case [case file number]. Information about postponements that are very short in duration or that occur close in time to the scheduled sale may not immediately be reflected in the telephone information or on the internet website. The best way to verify postponement information is to attend the scheduled sale.

If you would like additional copies of this summary, you may obtain them by calling [insert telephone number].

(e) Failure to provide these summaries to the mortgagor or trustor
 shall have the same effect as if the notice of default or notice of sale were incomplete or not provided.

(f) This section sets forth a requirement for translation in languages other than English, and a document complying with the provisions of this section may be recorded pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27293 of the Government Code. A document that complies with this section shall not be rejected for recordation on the ground that some part of the document is in a language other than English.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 28.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.4.

The purpose of the act that added this section is to ensure that, as part of the nonjudicial foreclosure process, borrowers are considered for, and have a meaningful opportunity to obtain, available loss mitigation options, if any, offered by or through the borrower’s mortgage servicer, such as loan modifications or other alternatives to foreclosure. Nothing in the act that added this section, however, shall be interpreted to require a
 particular result of that process.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 87, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   (SB 818)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.5.

(a) (1) A mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not record a notice of default pursuant to Section 2924 until both of the following:

(A) Either 30 days after initial contact is made as required by paragraph (2) or 30 days after satisfying the due diligence requirements as described in subdivision (e).

(B) The mortgage servicer complies with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2924.18, if the borrower has provided a complete application as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2924.18.

(2) (A) A mortgage servicer shall contact the borrower in person or by telephone in order to assess the borrower’s financial situation and explore options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure. During the initial contact, the mortgage servicer shall advise the borrower that the borrower has the right to request a subsequent meeting and, if requested, the mortgage servicer shall schedule the meeting to occur within 14 days. The assessment of the borrower’s financial situation and discussion of options may occur during the first contact, or at the subsequent meeting scheduled for that purpose. In either case, the borrower shall be provided the toll-free telephone number made available by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) to find a HUD-certified housing counseling agency. Any meeting may occur telephonically.

(B) The mortgage servicer shall notify the borrower during the initial contact required pursuant to subparagraph (A) that a third party, such as a family member, HUD-certified housing counselor, or attorney, may record a request to receive copies of any notice of default and notice of sale pursuant to the process described in Section 2924b and that receiving a copy of these documents may allow the third party to assist the borrower in avoiding foreclosure.

(b) A notice of default recorded pursuant to Section 2924 shall include a declaration that the mortgage servicer has contacted the borrower, has tried with due diligence to contact the borrower as required by this section, or that no contact was required because the individual did not meet the definition of “borrower” pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2920.5.

(c) A mortgage servicer’s loss mitigation personnel may participate by telephone during any contact required by this section.

(d) A borrower may designate, with consent given in writing, a HUD-certified housing counseling agency, attorney, or other advisor to discuss with the mortgage servicer, on the borrower’s behalf, the borrower’s financial situation and options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure. That contact made at the direction of the borrower shall satisfy the contact requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Any loan modification or workout plan offered at the meeting by the mortgage servicer is subject to approval by the borrower.

(e) A notice of default may be recorded pursuant to Section 2924
 when a mortgage servicer has not contacted a borrower as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) provided that the failure to contact the borrower occurred despite the due diligence of the mortgage servicer. For purposes of this section, “due diligence” shall require and mean all of the following:

(1) (A) A mortgage servicer shall first attempt to contact a borrower by sending a first-class letter that includes the toll-free telephone number made available by HUD to find a HUD-certified housing counseling agency.

(B) The mortgage servicer shall notify the borrower in the first-class letter described in subparagraph (A) that a third party, such as a family member, HUD-certified housing counselor, or attorney, may record a request to receive copies of any notice
 of default and notice of sale pursuant to the process described in Section 2924b and that receiving a copy of these documents may allow the third party to assist the borrower in avoiding foreclosure.

(2) (A) After the letter has been sent, the mortgage servicer shall attempt to contact the borrower by telephone at least three times at different hours and on different days. Telephone calls shall be made to the primary telephone number on file.

(B) A mortgage servicer may attempt to contact a borrower using an automated system to dial borrowers, provided that, if the telephone call is answered, the call is connected to a live representative of the mortgage servicer.

(C) A mortgage servicer satisfies the
 telephone contact requirements of this paragraph:

(i) If it determines, after attempting contact pursuant to this paragraph, that the borrower’s primary telephone number and secondary telephone number or numbers on file, if any, have been disconnected.
